Tennessee, session 114, HB0390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-7-109(d), is amended by deleting
the language "January 1" and substituting "January 15".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0390
001633
- 1 -